Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2208
Shares of capital stock; issuance; transfer; conditions; violation; effect.

A professional corporation may issue shares of its capital stock only to persons who are duly registered in Nebraska to render the same professional service as that provided in its articles of incorporation. A shareholder in a professional corporation may voluntarily transfer his shares only to a person who is duly licensed to render the same professional service as that for which the corporation was organized. No shares shall be issued by or transferred upon the books of the professional corporation unless there has been filed with the Secretary of State a certificate by the regulating board stating that the person to whom the shares are to be issued or transferred is duly licensed to render the same professional service as that for which the corporation was organized. Any share transferred or issued in violation of this section shall be null and void.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 8, p. 557.